Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
PART 2
FORAGE LOSSES

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act enacting this part 2, see section 1 of chapter 290, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

33-3-201. Scope of part - definitions.

This part 2 shall govern claims for damage arising from the foraging of wild ruminants on privately owned or leased private land and for which damage the state is liable under section 33-3-104 (1)(d). Except where inconsistent with a specific provision of this part 2, the provisions of part 1 of this article shall also apply to such claims.

For purposes of this part 2, "wild ruminants" includes elk and other ruminants within the definition of big game as set forth in section 33-1-102 (2).

Source:

L. 93:

Entire part added, p. 1720, § 3, effective June 6.

33-3-202. Head counts.

The claimant's head count of wild ruminants shall be made upon no less than twenty-four hours' notice to the division, which may arrange to have its personnel present when the count is made. The time of day at which the count is made shall be at the claimant's discretion. If the division chooses not to have personnel present, the claimant's head count shall be conclusive. Subsequent head counts may be made at intervals of ten days.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire part added, p. 1721, § 3, effective June 6.

33-3-203. Claims procedure.

When any person has sustained damage to livestock forage caused by wild ruminants, such person shall notify the division of such damages within ten days after the discovery thereof. In the case of recurring damage, the division shall be notified within ten days after the discovery of each new or different occurrence of damage.

Proof of loss forms shall be filed within ninety days after the last notice of loss is submitted to the division under subsection (1) of this section. The division, within thirty days after the filing of such proof of loss forms, shall make an investigation of the alleged loss, and, where possible, shall attempt to reach an agreement with the claimant upon an amount of settlement. All such agreements shall be completed and the settlement amount paid in full within sixty days after terms and conditions have been agreed upon; otherwise, at the claimant's option, the matter shall proceed to arbitration or to court as provided in this article.

If the division does not agree with the claimant on normal historic levels, or any element of a damage settlement, the matter shall be submitted to arbitration within ten days of notice by either party unless the claimant waives arbitration. The arbitration panel shall consist of one arbitrator chosen by the landowner, one arbitrator chosen by the division, and one arbitrator chosen by the other two arbitrators. If the two arbitrators cannot agree within ten days on a third arbitrator, a request by either party shall be made to the district court for the judicial district of the county in which the damage is located for appointment of a third impartial arbitrator. The division and the landowner shall equally share the cost of the use of the third arbitrator.

In any case which goes to arbitration, all arbitrators chosen shall reside within fifty miles of the subject property. The arbitration proceeding shall be conducted pursuant to part 2 of article 22 of title 13, C.R.S. The decision of the arbitration panel shall be binding and shall be subject to judicial review only for statutory compliance with the provisions of this article and the said act. The claimant or the division may seek such review by filing an action for same in the county or district court in the county or judicial district where the subject damage is alleged to have occurred within thirty days after receipt of the arbitration panel's decision.

Any waiver of arbitration shall be in writing and shall be mailed to the division within ten days after the claimant receives notification from the division of the denial of the claim, or within ten days after the claimant receives from the division an offer of settlement unacceptable to such claimant.

In adjudication of any claim, should the court find that the claimant has made or the division has contested the claim without a substantial legal or factual basis, the court shall award the other party reasonable attorney fees, not to exceed the actual amount incurred, upon the submission of satisfactory proof thereof.

For payment to a claimant, the controller shall draw a warrant upon a voucher approved by the division and the state treasurer shall pay the amount of settlement out of the wildlife cash fund.

The division shall furnish forms to be used for the notice and proof of loss required under this section.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire part added, p. 1721, § 3, effective June 6.

L. 2004:

(2)(b)(II) amended, p. 1732, § 4, effective August 4.

33-3-204. Waiver of arbitration - action for damages.

If a claimant waives the right to arbitration pursuant to the provisions of section 33-3-203, the commission shall review the claim as provided in section 33-3-107. Such claimant may commence an action for damages and, in connection therewith, shall be entitled to a trial de novo in any court of the county in which the damage or any portion thereof is alleged to have occurred. The division may be represented by a full-time employee in small claims court. Such action shall be filed within sixty days after the claimant receives notice of denial by the commission, which notice shall set forth the reasons for denial, or within sixty days after the claimant receives an offer of settlement from the commission. If the action is not filed within said sixty-day period, such action shall be forever barred.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire part added, p. 1722, § 3, effective June 6.